Maryland, session 2026, SB0657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
SUBTITLE 42. PAREA GRANT PROGRAM.
18–4201.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PAREA” MEANS THE PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE
APPRAISAL.
(C) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE
APPRAISAL GRANT PROGRAM.
18–4202.
(A) THERE IS A PRACTICAL APPLICATIONS OF REAL ESTATE APPRAISAL
GRANT PROGRAM IN THE COMMISSION.
– 1 –

Ch. 743 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO:
(1) ASSIST IN CLOSING APPRAISAL GAPS THAT OCCUR IN
HISTORICALLY REDLINED NEIGHBORHOODS AND UNDERREPRESENTED
COMMUNITIES;
(2) AWARD GRANTS TO MINORITIES WHO RESIDE IN HISTORICALLY
REDLINED NEIGHBORHOODS AND UNDERREPRESENTED COMMUNITIES WITH THE
GOAL OF PURSUING PAREA; AND
(3) DIVERSIFY THE APPRAISAL FIELD.
(C) THE COMMISSION SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –